Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6922
Tax credits; use.

(1) The credits allowed under section 77-6920 may be used:

(a) To obtain a refund of sales and use taxes paid under the Local Option Revenue Act, the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, the Qualified Judgment Payment Act, and sections 13-319, 13-324, and 13-2813;

(b) As a refundable income tax credit claimed on an income tax return of the taxpayer. The return need not reflect any income tax liability owed by the taxpayer;

(c) To reduce the taxpayer's income tax withholding employer or payor tax liability under section 77-2756 or 77-2757. To the extent of the credit used, such withholding shall not constitute public funds or state tax revenue and shall not constitute a trust fund or be owned by the state. The use by the taxpayer of the credit shall not change the amount that otherwise would be reported by the taxpayer to the employee under section 77-2754 as income tax withheld and shall not reduce the amount that otherwise would be allowed by the state as a refundable credit on an employee's income tax return as income tax withheld under section 77-2755. The amount of credits used against income tax withholding shall not exceed the withholding attributable to the number of new equivalent employees employed by the taxpayer. If the amount of credit used by the taxpayer against income tax withholding exceeds such amount, the excess withholding shall be returned to the Department of Revenue in the manner provided in section 77-2756, such excess amount returned shall be considered unused, and the amount of unused credits may be used as otherwise permitted in this section; and

(d) To obtain a payment from the state equal to the real property taxes due after the year the required levels of employment and investment were met, for real property at a qualified location that is acquired by the taxpayer after the date the application was filed. The payment from the state shall be made only after payment of the real property taxes have been made to the county as required by law. Payments shall not be allowed for any taxes paid on real property for which the taxes are divided under section 18-2147 or 58-507.

(2) A claim for the credit may be filed quarterly for refund of the sales and use taxes paid, either directly or indirectly, after the filing of the income tax return for the taxable year in which the credit was first allowed.

(3) Once the taxpayer attains the required levels of employment and investment, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a refund of all sales and use taxes paid, either directly or indirectly, under the Local Option Revenue Act, the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, the Qualified Judgment Payment Act, and sections 13-319, 13-324, and 13-2813 on the qualifying investment.

(4) For purposes of subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the taxpayer shall be deemed to have paid indirectly any sales or use taxes paid by a contractor with a purchasing agent agreement on building materials annexed to an improvement to real estate built for the taxpayer. The contractor shall certify to the taxpayer the amount of the sales and use taxes paid on the building materials, or the taxpayer, with the permission of the Director of Economic Development and a certification from the contractor that sales and use taxes were paid on all building materials, may presume that fifty percent of the cost of the improvement was for building materials annexed to real estate on which the tax was paid.

(5) Credits distributed to a partner, limited liability company member, shareholder, or beneficiary under section 77-6925 may be used against the income tax liability of the partner, member, shareholder, or beneficiary receiving the credits.

Laws 2021, LB544, § 22.

Local Option Revenue Act, see section 77-27,148.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.

Qualified Judgment Payment Act, see section 77-6401.